District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.36

Consolidation with WMATA.

The District Department of Transportation shall coordinate with WMATA to evaluate whether operations under this subchapter should be consolidated with existing services provided by WMATA, while maintaining the distinctive features of the DC Circulator service.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11f
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(e), 53 DCR 10232
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 153, 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section heading.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).